Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,115.01
Political subdivision; ordinance or resolution; restrictions.

A political subdivision shall not enact an ordinance or resolution which is in conflict with the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 30.